Mississippi, session 2026, SB2304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Every student-athlete in this state, whether in public secondary school or any school that is a member of the Mississippi High School Activities Association (MHSAA), shall be allowed one (1) transfer to another school or school district during his or her length of eligibility without loss of eligibility or any other penalty for such transfer.  The eligibility upon transfer provided for herein shall not preclude enforcement of any other participation rules or requirements. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.